Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.290

Contracts for building engineering systems.

(1) A state agency or local government may award contracts of any value for the design, fabrication, and installation of building engineering systems by: (a) Using a competitive bidding process or request for proposals process where bidders are required to provide final specifications and a bid price for the design, fabrication, and installation of building engineering systems, with the final specifications being approved by an appropriate design, engineering, and/or public regulatory body; or (b) using a competitive bidding process where bidders are required to provide final specifications for the final design, fabrication, and installation of building engineering systems as part of a larger project with the final specifications for the building engineering systems portion of the project being approved by an appropriate design, engineering, and/or public regulatory body. The provisions of chapter 39.80 RCW do not apply to the design of building engineering systems that are included as part of a contract described under this section.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Building engineering systems" means those systems where contracts for the systems customarily have been awarded with a requirement that the contractor provide final approved specifications, including fire alarm systems, building sprinkler systems, pneumatic tube systems, extensions of heating, ventilation, or air conditioning control systems, chlorination and chemical feed systems, emergency generator systems, building signage systems, pile foundations, and curtain wall systems.

(b) "Local government" means any county, city, town, school district, or other special district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.

(c) "State agency" means the department of enterprise services, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources, any institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the department of enterprise services to engage in building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

[ 2015 c 225 s 35; 2001 c 34 s 1.]

NOTES: